Tennessee, session 114, SB2117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-22-414(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the language:
TRICOR has as part of its mission to offset the costs of incarceration by
generating revenue through the sale of products in lieu of state appropriated
funds.
and substituting instead:
TRICOR has as part of its mission to offset the costs of incarceration by
generating revenue through the sale of products and the operation of
commissary programs within state prisons in lieu of state appropriated funds.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-22-414, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the TRICOR board, within the
principles of free enterprise, and for the purpose of carrying out its legislative intent as
stated in subsection (a), may operate commissary programs within state prisons.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2117
011939
- 1 -